Washington statutes.
RCW 15.08.140

Hearing on costs—Notice—Service.

The county auditor shall forthwith issue warrants in payment of the labor employed in the work, and thereupon the county shall be subrogated to all rights of the laborers so paid. He or she shall fix the day for hearing on the record before the county commissioners, which shall be not less than twenty days from the date of filing. He or she shall prepare a notice directed to the owner or reputed owner of the premises of the filing of the record and claim and the hearing thereon, the time and place of the hearing and the amount of the claim. The sheriff shall serve the notice in the manner provided for service of the notice to disinfect, and file with the auditor before the hearing, his or her return of service and the amount of his or her fees, which shall be the same as for service of summons in civil proceedings.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6011; 1961 c 11 s 15.08.140. Prior: 1927 c 311 s 5, part; 1921 c 141 s 5, part; 1915 c 166 s 14, part; RRS s 2852, part.]